Wyoming statutes. Title 10 Aeronautics
Article 1. Powers of Local Government

§ 10-5-101.
Powers of municipalities and counties generally; rules and regulations.

Municipal corporations and counties within the state are authorized at the discretion of their governing boards, acting either singly or jointly to:

Acquire, by lease, purchase, or otherwise, lands and other property for airport purposes, and to construct, maintain and operate these facilities for the landing, housing, care and departure of air-borne craft;

Construct, maintain and operate terminal office, traffic control and nonaviation buildings; warehouses; barracks; meteorology facilities; maintenance, repair and assembly shops; runways and taxiing strips; accommodations for mail, freight and express services; and all other attendant facilities;

Install, maintain and operate markers, lights and other aids to air navigation;

Lease or let any portion of the area, buildings or facilities to any private person or corporation, upon terms deemed satisfactory. Notice shall be given by publication at least once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper published in a town or county in which the airport is located when it is proposed that all the area and total facilities are to be leased;

Direct, manage, conduct or contract for air shows, exhibitions and other public entertainment and, if desired, set a fee for admission;

Appoint a board of trustees to act under any authority granted to the governing body of the municipality or county acting separately or jointly;

Enter into cooperative agreements with federal agencies; and

Do all things necessary in the discretion of the city, town or county governing authority for the purpose of making effective the powers conferred by W.S.

10-5-101

through

10-5-204

.

Any city, town or county governing authority in the state, either singly or jointly, may prescribe and enforce rules and regulations not in conflict with W.S.

10-5-101

through

10-5-204

by ordinance or resolution, governing these airports. The municipal court of the city or town has jurisdiction to punish any violator of the ordinances of the city or town governing an airport whether the airport is within or without the city limits.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 72, § 5; 1929, ch. 66, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 33-301; W.S. 1957, § 10-37; Laws 1959, ch. 57, § 1; 1975, ch. 132, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

10-4-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 22, § 1; 1995, ch. 56, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), substituted “municipal court” for “police court.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Class of facilities regarded as essential for airport. —

The legislature by this section, which granted the power to municipal corporations to acquire lands and other property for “airport purposes” and to construct thereon and maintain and operate such facilities as deemed necessary for the “housing” and “care” of aircraft, set forth terminal buildings, warehouses, repair and assembly shops, and “all other attendant facilities” as falling within the class which it regarded as essential or necessary facilities of an airport. City of Cheyenne v. Board of County Comm'rs, 484 P.2d 706,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. 1971).

Board authority to purchase property.—

Airport board had the statutory authority to issue revenue bonds to fund the purchase of intangible property, including goodwill, as the plain language of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

10-5-202

revealed an intent not to restrict what could be purchased, and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

10-5-101

included no limitation between tangible and intangible property. Herrick v. Jackson Hole Airport Bd., 2019 WY 118, 452 P.3d 1276,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2019).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Municipal Action Exemption to the Federal Antitrust Laws: Increased Antitrust Exposure for Wyoming Cities and Towns,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 673 (1984).